Nevada, session 83, SB340.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The Legislature hereby finds that:
(a) Under the separation-of-powers provision of Section 1 of
Article 3 of the Nevada Constitution, one department of the State
Government may not exercise powers properly belonging to another
department of the State Government except in cases expressly
directed or permitted in the Nevada Constitution.
(b) In 1996, Nevada’s voters approved a constitutional
amendment to the separation-of-powers provision which expressly
empowers the Legislature to provide by law for legislative agencies
and legislative bodies composed of members of the Senate and
Assembly to suspend or nullify regulations adopted by executive
agencies on the basis that the regulations exceed the statutory
authority of the agencies or are inconsistent with legislative intent.
(c) When the constitutional amendment was presented to the
voters, the ballot materials explained that its purpose was to ensure
that the Legislative Department had the specific constitutional
power to suspend or nullify regulations adopted by executive
agencies which exceed the statutory authority granted by the
Legislature when it passed the laws that authorized the agencies to
adopt the regulations.
(d) Because Nevada’s voters expressly granted specific
constitutional power to the Legislature to provide by law for
legislative agencies and legislative bodies composed of members of
the Senate and Assembly to suspend or nullify regulations adopted
by executive agencies, the other departments may not infringe upon
the exercise of that power out of respect for an equal and coordinate
department of government.
(e) When executive agencies adopt regulations which exceed
their statutory authority or are inconsistent with legislative intent,
the regulations thwart and undermine the will of the people who,
through their elected representatives in the Legislature, determine by
properly enacted laws the scope and extent of the authority granted
to executive agencies to adopt regulations.
(f) When a regulation adopted by an executive agency is alleged
to exceed the statutory authority or to be inconsistent with
legislative intent, the issue should be resolved by legislative
agencies and legislative bodies composed of members of the Senate
and Assembly under the exclusive power expressly granted by
Nevada’s voters to suspend or nullify regulations adopted by
executive agencies.
2. The Legislature hereby declares that there is a legitimate and
compelling need to exercise its expressly granted and specific
-
*SB340_R1*

– 6 –
constitutional power under Section 1 of Article 3 of the Nevada
Constitution, in the manner set forth in the provisions of this act, in
order to:
(a) Provide by law for legislative agencies and legislative bodies
composed of members of the Senate and Assembly to suspend or
nullify regulations adopted by executive agencies which exceed
their statutory authority or are inconsistent with legislative intent;
and
(b) Protect and safeguard the rights of people against such
unlawful and invalid regulations.
Sec. 2. Chapter 233B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. In addition to a petition that is required to be
submitted pursuant to NRS 233B.110, a person or adopting
agency may submit a petition pursuant to this section requesting
that the Legislative Commission review whether any permanent or
temporary regulation that has been filed with the Secretary of
State pursuant to NRS 233B.070 should be suspended or nullified,
in whole or in part, based on one or more of the following
grounds:
(a) The regulation exceeds the statutory authority pursuant to
which the regulation was adopted;
(b) The regulation does not carry out the intent of the
Legislature in granting the statutory authority pursuant to which
the regulation was adopted; or
(c) The regulation is not being administered or interpreted by
the adopting agency in a manner consistent with the stated intent
of the agency when adopting the regulation or during the review
and approval of the regulation by the Legislative Commission.
2. In order to submit a petition pursuant to this section, the
person or adopting agency must submit the petition to the
Legislative Counsel in a format prescribed by the Legislative
Counsel. The petition must contain sufficient allegations and
arguments regarding the issues, including citations to relevant
legal authorities, to provide for meaningful review of whether the
regulation should be suspended or nullified based on one or more
of the grounds set forth in subsection 1.
3. If a petition is properly submitted to the Legislative
Counsel, the Chair of the Legislative Commission shall submit the
petition to the Subcommittee to Review Regulations. The
Subcommittee to Review Regulations shall review the petition in
consultation with the Legislative Counsel and make a
recommendation to the Chair of the Legislative Commission
regarding whether the Chair should schedule the matter for a
meeting of the Legislative Commission.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 7 –
4. After receipt of the recommendation made by the
Subcommittee to Review Regulations pursuant to subsection 3, the
Chair of the Legislative Commission may:
(a) Schedule the matter for a meeting of the Legislative
Commission if the Chair determines that the petition contains
sufficient allegations and arguments regarding the issues,
including citations to relevant legal authorities, to provide for
meaningful review of whether the regulation should be suspended
or nullified based on one or more of the grounds set forth in
subsection 1; or
(b) Decline to schedule the matter for a meeting of the
Legislative Commission if the Chair determines that the petition:
(1) Does not contain sufficient allegations or arguments
regarding the issues, including citations to relevant legal
authorities, to provide for meaningful review of whether the
regulation should be suspended or nullified based on one or more
of the grounds set forth in subsection 1;
(2) Does not warrant review by the Legislative Commission
because it contains substantially the same or similar allegations or
arguments regarding the issues presented in previous petitions
submitted pursuant to this section; or
(3) Does not warrant review by the Legislative Commission
for any other reason.
5. If the Chair of the Legislative Commission declines to
schedule the matter for a meeting of the Legislative Commission,
the Legislative Counsel shall provide written notice of the
determination to the petitioner.
6. If the Chair of the Legislative Commission decides to
schedule the matter for one or more meetings of the Legislative
Commission, the Legislative Counsel shall, at least 30 days before
the initial meeting to review the petition, provide the petitioner
and, if the petitioner is not the adopting agency, the adopting
agency with written notice of the meeting which includes, without
limitation:
(a) A copy of the petition submitted pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) A copy of the regulation that will be considered at the
initial meeting; and
(c) A summary of the issues to be determined at the initial
meeting that could result in the suspension or nullification of the
regulation. The summary of the issues provided pursuant to this
paragraph:
(1) Must include sufficient information to allow the
petitioner and, if the petitioner is not the adopting agency, the
adopting agency to prepare for the initial meeting.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 8 –
(2) Does not preclude the Legislative Commission from
considering any other issues at the initial or any subsequent
meeting to review the petition that could result in the suspension
or nullification of the regulation.
7. At the initial meeting to review the petition, the Chair of
the Legislative Commission shall provide the petitioner and, if the
petitioner is not the adopting agency, the adopting agency with an
opportunity to present comment on the issues raised in the petition
and whether the regulation should be suspended or nullified,
subject to any reasonable requirements and restrictions on such
presentations.
8. At the initial or any subsequent meeting to review the
petition, the Legislative Commission may suspend or nullify the
regulation, in whole or in part, if the Legislative Commission
determines that the regulation:
(a) Exceeds the statutory authority pursuant to which the
regulation was adopted;
(b) Does not carry out the intent of the Legislature in granting
the statutory authority pursuant to which the regulation was
adopted; or
(c) Is not being administered or interpreted by the adopting
agency in a manner consistent with the stated intent of the agency
when adopting the regulation or during the review and approval of
the regulation by the Legislative Commission.
9. If the Legislative Commission takes action to suspend or
nullify a regulation, in whole or in part, pursuant to this section,
the Legislative Counsel shall, as soon as practicable after such
action, provide the Secretary of State and the adopting agency
with written notice of:
(a) The suspension of the regulation or any part of the
regulation and when the suspension becomes effective and when it
expires; or
(b) The nullification of the regulation or any part of the
regulation and when the nullification becomes effective.
10. As soon as practicable after the Legislative Counsel
provides the Secretary of State and the adopting agency with
written notice of the nullification of a regulation or any part of the
regulation pursuant to this section:
(a) The Legislative Counsel shall remove the nullified
regulation or part of the regulation from the Nevada
Administrative Code; and
(b) The adopting agency shall remove the nullified regulation
or part of the regulation from any agency publications, notices or
other documents made available to the public or provided to
persons regulated by the agency.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 9 –
11. Any action taken or determination made by the
Legislative Commission or the Chair of the Legislative
Commission pursuant to this section, including, without
limitation, any action or determination to suspend or nullify a
regulation, in whole or in part, is final and is not subject to
judicial review.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Adopting agency” means the agency that adopted the
regulation or any successor agency that administers the
regulation.
(b) “Subcommittee to Review Regulations” means the
Subcommittee to Review Regulations appointed pursuant to
subsection 6 of NRS 233B.067.
Sec. 4. 1. The Legislative Commission shall adopt such
regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section and NRS 233B.0395 to 233B.120, inclusive, and section 3
of this act. The Legislative Commission’s adoption of such
regulations is exempted from the requirements of this chapter and
is final and is not subject to judicial review.
2. For meetings of the Legislative Commission relating to a
petition requesting the suspension or nullification of a regulation
pursuant to section 3 of this act, the regulations adopted by the
Legislative Commission pursuant to this section must establish
procedural standards that provide persons who are regulated by or
otherwise interested in the regulation with an opportunity to
present comment on the issues raised in the petition and whether
the regulation should be suspended or nullified, subject to any
reasonable requirements and restrictions on such presentations.
3. The Legislative Counsel shall include the regulations
adopted by the Legislative Commission pursuant to this section in
the Nevada Administrative Code.
Sec. 5. NRS 233B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.020 1. By this chapter, the Legislature intends to
establish [minimum] procedural requirements for :
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the
regulation-making and adjudication procedure of all agencies of the
Executive Department of the State Government and for judicial
review of both functions, except as to those agencies expressly
exempted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
(b) The exercise by the Legislative Commission of the power to
review, object to, suspend or nullify a regulation as authorized by
Section 1 of Article 3 of the Nevada Constitution and NRS
233B.0395 to 233B.120, inclusive, and sections 3 and 4 of this act,
except that the exercise of such a power by the Legislative
Commission is final and not subject to judicial review.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 10 –
2. This chapter confers no additional regulation-making
authority upon any agency except to the extent provided in
subsection 1 of NRS 233B.050.
[2.] 3. The provisions of this chapter are intended to
supplement statutes applicable to specific agencies. This chapter
does not abrogate or limit additional requirements imposed on such
agencies by statute or otherwise recognized by law.
Sec. 6. NRS 233B.038 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.038 1. “Regulation” means:
(a) An agency rule, standard, directive or statement of general
applicability which effectuates or interprets law or policy, or
describes the organization, procedure or practice requirements of
any agency;
(b) A proposed regulation;
(c) The amendment or repeal of a prior regulation; and
(d) The general application by an agency of a written policy,
interpretation, process or procedure to determine whether a person is
in compliance with a federal or state statute or regulation in order to
assess a fine, monetary penalty or monetary interest.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A statement concerning only the internal management of an
agency and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the
public;
(b) A declaratory ruling;
(c) An intraagency memorandum;
(d) A manual of internal policies and procedures or audit
procedures of an agency which is used solely to train or provide
guidance to employees of the agency and which is not used as
authority in a contested case to determine whether a person is in
compliance with a federal or state statute or regulation;
(e) An agency decision or finding in a contested case;
(f) An advisory opinion issued by an agency that is not of
general applicability;
(g) A published opinion of the Attorney General;
(h) An interpretation of an agency that has statutory authority to
issue interpretations;
(i) Letters of approval, concurrence or disapproval issued in
relation to a permit for a specific project or activity;
(j) A contract or agreement into which an agency has entered;
(k) The provisions of a federal law, regulation or guideline;
(l) An emergency action taken by an agency that is necessary to
protect public health and safety;
(m) [The application by an agency of a policy, interpretation,
process or procedure to a person who has sufficient prior actual
notice of the policy, interpretation, process or procedure to
-
*SB340_R1*

– 11 –
determine whether the person is in compliance with a federal or
state statute or regulation in order to assess a fine, monetary penalty
or monetary interest;
(n)] A regulation concerning the use of public roads or facilities
which is indicated to the public by means of signs, signals and other
traffic-control devices that conform with the manual and
specifications for a uniform system of official traffic-control devices
adopted pursuant to NRS 484A.430;
[(o)] (n) The classification of wildlife or the designation of
seasons for hunting, fishing or trapping by regulation of the Board
of Wildlife Commissioners pursuant to the provisions of title 45 of
NRS; or
[(p)] (o) A technical bulletin prepared pursuant to NRS 360.133.
Sec. 7. NRS 233B.0395 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.0395 The Nevada Administrative Code as most recently
revised or supplemented before [May 15, 1987,] February 3, 2025,
and the text of those regulations which have been prepared by the
Legislative Counsel for inclusion in the Nevada Administrative
Code on or before [May 15, 1987,] February 3, 2025, but have not
been included, are hereby ratified.
Sec. 8. NRS 233B.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.040 1. To the extent authorized by the statutes
applicable to it, each agency may adopt reasonable regulations to aid
it in carrying out the functions assigned to it by law and shall adopt
such regulations as are necessary to the proper execution of those
functions. If adopted and filed in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter, the following regulations have the force of law and
must be enforced by all peace officers:
(a) The Nevada Administrative Code; and
(b) Temporary and emergency regulations.
 In every instance, the power to adopt regulations to carry out a
particular function is limited by the terms of the grant of authority
pursuant to which the function was assigned.
2. Every regulation adopted by an agency must include:
(a) A citation of the authority pursuant to which it, or any part of
it, was adopted; and
(b) The address of the agency and, to the extent not elsewhere
provided in the regulation, a brief explanation of the procedures for
obtaining clarification of the regulation or relief from the strict
application of any of its terms, if the agency is authorized by a
specific statute to grant such relief, or otherwise dealing with the
agency in connection with the regulation.
3. An agency may adopt by reference in a regulation material
published by another authority in book or pamphlet form if:
-
*SB340_R1*

– 12 –
(a) It files one copy of the publication with the Secretary of
State and one copy with the State Library, Archives and Public
Records Administrator, and makes at least one copy available for
public inspection with its regulations; and
(b) The reference discloses the source and price for purchase of
the publication.
 An agency shall not attempt to incorporate any other material in a
regulation by reference.
4. An agency shall adopt and submit a proposed regulation to
the Legislative Commission for review not later than 2 years after
the date on which the proposed regulation is submitted to the
Legislative Counsel pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 233B.063. If
an agency does not adopt and submit a proposed regulation to the
Legislative Commission for review within the time prescribed by
this subsection, the executive head of the agency shall appear
personally before the Legislative Commission and explain why the
proposed regulation has not been adopted [.] and submitted to the
Legislative Commission for review.
Sec. 9. NRS 233B.061 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.061 1. All interested persons must be afforded a
reasonable opportunity to submit data, views or arguments upon a
proposed regulation, orally or in writing.
2. Before holding the public hearing required pursuant to
subsection 3, an agency shall conduct at least one workshop to
solicit comments from interested persons on one or more general
topics to be addressed in a proposed regulation, except that a
workshop is not required if it is the second or subsequent hearing on
the regulation. Not less than 15 days before the workshop, the
agency shall provide notice of the time and place set for the
workshop:
(a) In writing to each person who has requested to be placed on
a mailing list; and
(b) In any other manner reasonably calculated to provide such
notice to the general public and any business that may be affected
by a proposed regulation which addresses the general topics to be
considered at the workshop.
3. [With respect to substantive regulations, the] The agency
shall set a time and place for an oral public hearing, but if no one
appears who will be directly affected by the proposed regulation and
requests an oral hearing, the agency may proceed immediately to act
upon any written submissions. The agency shall consider fully all
written and oral submissions respecting the proposed regulation.
4. An agency shall not hold the public hearing required
pursuant to subsection 3 on the same day that the agency holds the
workshop required pursuant to subsection 2.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 13 –
5. Each workshop and public hearing required pursuant to
subsections 2 and 3 must be conducted in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 241 of NRS.
Sec. 10. NRS 233B.0613 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
233B.0613 1. If an agency determines that an emergency
exists [,] and wants to adopt an emergency regulation, it shall
submit to the Governor the original copy of the proposed
emergency regulation with a written statement of the emergency
which sets forth the reasons for [the] its determination [. If] that an
emergency exists.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the
Governor endorses the statement of the emergency by written
endorsement at the end of the full text of the statement of the
emergency on the original copy of [a] the proposed regulation, the
emergency regulation may be adopted and become effective
immediately upon its being filed in the Office of the Secretary of
State pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 233B.070. The statement of
the emergency endorsed by the Governor must be included as a part
of the emergency regulation for all purposes.
[2.] 3. If practicable, the agency shall, not later than 9 a.m. on
the first working day before the date on which the emergency
regulation is filed in the Office of the Secretary of State pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 233B.070, make the emergency regulation
available to the public by:
(a) Providing a copy of the emergency regulation to a member
of the public upon request; and
(b) Making a copy of the emergency regulation available on its
website on the Internet, if any.
[3.] 4. If practicable, the agency shall, not later than 9 a.m. on
the first working day before the date of any hearing at which the
agency considers the emergency regulation, make the version of
the proposed emergency regulation that will be considered at the
hearing available to the public by:
(a) Providing a copy of the proposed emergency regulation to a
member of the public upon request; and
(b) Making a copy of the proposed emergency regulation
available on its website on the Internet, if any.
[4. A]
5. An emergency regulation adopted pursuant to this section
may not be [effective] :
(a) Effective for a period [of not] longer than 120 days. [A
regulation may be adopted]
(b) Adopted by this emergency procedure [only once.
5.] more than once.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 14 –
(c) Substantially identical, in whole or in part, to a regulation
suspended or nullified by the Legislative Commission pursuant to
Section 1 of Article 3 of the Nevada Constitution and NRS
233B.0395 to 233B.120, inclusive, and sections 3 and 4 of this act.
6. If an agency adopts, after providing notice and the
opportunity for a hearing as required in this chapter, a permanent or
temporary regulation which becomes effective and is substantially
identical to its effective emergency regulation, the emergency
regulation expires automatically on the effective date of the
temporary or permanent regulation.
Sec. 11. NRS 233B.0617 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
233B.0617 1. No regulation adopted after July 1, 1965, is
valid unless adopted in substantial compliance with this chapter but
no objection to any regulation on the ground of noncompliance with
the procedural requirements of NRS 233B.060 to 233B.0617,
inclusive, may be made more than 2 years after its effective date.
This section must not be construed to establish a time bar for
making an objection to a regulation on any grounds other than
noncompliance with the procedural requirements of NRS
233B.060 to 233B.0617, inclusive.
2. Regulations in effect on July 1, 1965, continue in effect until
amended , suspended, nullified or repealed in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, if an original and two copies were
deposited with the Secretary of State on or before July 1, 1965.
Sec. 12. NRS 233B.0653 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
233B.0653 1. The Legislative Counsel shall periodically
prepare and publish [or cause to be prepared and published]
electronically a Register of Administrative Regulations [.] on the
public Internet website of the Legislature. The Register must
include the following information regarding each permanent
regulation adopted by an agency:
(a) The proposed and adopted text of the regulation and any
revised version of the regulation;
(b) The notice of intent to act upon the regulation set forth in
NRS 233B.0603;
(c) The written notice of adoption of the regulation required
pursuant to NRS 233B.064;
(d) The informational statement required pursuant to NRS
233B.066; and
(e) The effective date of the regulation, as determined pursuant
to NRS 233B.070.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 15 –
[ In carrying out the duties set forth in this subsection, the
Legislative Counsel may use the services of the State Printing
Office.
2. The Legislative Counsel shall publish the Register not less
than 10 times per year but not more than once every 2 weeks.
3. The Register must be provided to and maintained by:
(a) The Secretary of State;
(b) The Attorney General;
(c) The Supreme Court Law Library;
(d) The State Library, Archives and Public Records;
(e) Each county clerk;
(f) Each county library; and
(g) The Legislative Counsel Bureau.
4. The Legislative Counsel may sell an additional copy of the
Register to any person or governmental entity that requests a copy,
at a price which does not exceed the cost of publishing the
additional copy.
5.] 2. The Legislative Counsel is immune from civil liability
which may result from failure to include any information in the
Register.
Sec. 13. NRS 233B.067 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.067 1. After adopting a permanent regulation, the
agency shall submit the informational statement prepared pursuant
to NRS 233B.066 and one copy of each regulation adopted to the
Legislative Counsel for review by the Legislative Commission to
determine whether to approve the regulation [.] , which includes
determining whether the regulation conforms to the statutory
authority pursuant to which it was adopted and whether the
regulation carries out the intent of the Legislature in granting that
authority. The Legislative Counsel shall endorse on the original and
the copy of each adopted regulation the date of their receipt. The
Legislative Counsel shall maintain the copy of the regulation in a
file and make the copy available for public inspection for 2 years.
2. If an agency submits an adopted regulation to the Legislative
Counsel pursuant to subsection 1 that:
(a) The agency is required to adopt pursuant to a federal statute
or regulation; and
(b) Exceeds the specific statutory authority of the agency or sets
forth requirements that are more stringent than a statute of this State,
 it shall include a statement that adoption of the regulation is
required by a federal statute or regulation. The statement must
include the specific citation of the federal statute or regulation
requiring such adoption.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
Legislative Commission shall:
-
*SB340_R1*

– 16 –
(a) Review the regulation at its next regularly scheduled meeting
if the regulation is received more than 10 working days before the
meeting; or
(b) Refer the regulation for review to the Subcommittee to
Review Regulations appointed pursuant to subsection 6.
4. If an agency determines that an emergency exists which
requires a regulation of the agency submitted pursuant to subsection
1 to become effective before the next meeting of the Legislative
Commission is scheduled to be held, the agency may notify the
Legislative Counsel in writing of the emergency. Upon receipt of
such a notice, the Legislative Counsel shall refer the regulation for
review by the Subcommittee to Review Regulations. The
Subcommittee shall meet to review the regulation as soon as
practicable.
5. If the Legislative Commission, or the Subcommittee to
Review Regulations if the regulation was referred, approves the
regulation, the Legislative Counsel shall promptly file the regulation
with the Secretary of State and notify the agency of the filing. If the
Commission or Subcommittee objects to the regulation after
determining that:
(a) If subsection 2 is applicable, the regulation is not required
pursuant to a federal statute or regulation;
(b) The regulation does not conform to statutory authority;
(c) The regulation does not carry out legislative intent;
(d) The small business impact statement is inaccurate,
incomplete or did not adequately consider or significantly
underestimated the economic effect of the regulation on small
businesses; or
(e) The agency has not provided a satisfactory explanation of the
need for the regulation in its informational statement as required
pursuant to NRS 233B.066, or the informational statement is
insufficient or incomplete,
 the Legislative Counsel shall attach to the regulation a written
notice of the objection, including, if practicable, a statement of the
reasons for the objection, and shall promptly return the regulation to
the agency.
6. As soon as practicable after each regular legislative session,
the Legislative Commission shall appoint a Subcommittee to
Review Regulations consisting of at least three members or alternate
members of the Legislative Commission.
Sec. 14. NRS 233B.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.070 1. A permanent regulation becomes effective when
the Legislative Counsel files with the Secretary of State the original
of the final draft or revision of a regulation, except as otherwise
-
*SB340_R1*

– 17 –
provided in NRS 293.247 or where a later date is specified in the
regulation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 233B.0633, an agency
that has adopted a temporary regulation may not file the temporary
regulation with the Secretary of State until 35 days after the date on
which the temporary regulation was adopted by the agency. A
temporary regulation becomes effective when the agency files with
the Secretary of State the original of the final draft or revision of the
regulation, together with the informational statement prepared
pursuant to NRS 233B.066. The agency shall also file a copy of the
temporary regulation with the Legislative Counsel, together with the
informational statement prepared pursuant to NRS 233B.066.
3. An emergency regulation becomes effective when the
agency files with the Secretary of State the original of the final draft
or revision of an emergency regulation, together with the
informational statement prepared pursuant to NRS 233B.066 [.] and
a copy of the written statement of the emergency endorsed by the
Governor pursuant to NRS 233B.0613. The agency shall also file a
copy of the emergency regulation with the Legislative Counsel,
together with the informational statement prepared pursuant to NRS
233B.066 [.] and a copy of the written statement of the emergency
endorsed by the Governor pursuant to NRS 233B.0613.
4. The Secretary of State shall maintain the original of the final
draft or revision of each regulation in a permanent file to be used
only for the preparation of official copies.
5. The Secretary of State shall file, with the original of each
agency’s rules of practice, the current statement of the agency
concerning the date and results of its most recent review of those
rules.
6. Immediately after each permanent or temporary regulation is
filed, the agency shall deliver one copy of the final draft or revision,
bearing the stamp of the Secretary of State indicating that it has
been filed, including material adopted by reference which is not
already filed with the State Library, Archives and Public Records
Administrator, to the State Library, Archives and Public Records
Administrator for use by the public. If the agency is a licensing
board as defined in NRS 439B.225 and it has adopted a permanent
regulation relating to standards for the issuance or renewal of
licenses, permits or certificates of registration issued to a person or
facility regulated by the agency, the agency shall also deliver one
copy of the regulation, bearing the stamp of the Secretary of State,
to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services within 10 days after the regulation is filed with the
Secretary of State.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 18 –
7. Each agency shall furnish a copy of all or part of that part of
the Nevada Administrative Code which contains its regulations, to
any person who requests a copy, and may charge a reasonable fee
for the copy based on the cost of reproduction if it does not have
money appropriated or authorized for that purpose.
8. An agency which publishes any regulations included in the
Nevada Administrative Code shall use the exact text of the
regulation as it appears in the Nevada Administrative Code,
including the leadlines and numbers of the sections. Any other
material which an agency includes in a publication with its
regulations must be presented in a form which clearly distinguishes
that material from the regulations.
Sec. 15. NRS 233B.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.100 1. Any interested person may petition an agency
requesting the adoption, filing, amendment or repeal of any
regulation and shall accompany the petition with relevant data,
views and arguments. Each agency shall prescribe by regulation the
form for such petitions and the procedure for their submission,
consideration and disposition. Upon submission of such a petition,
the agency shall within 30 days either deny the petition in writing,
stating its reasons, or initiate regulation-making proceedings.
2. Any regulation of any agency is subject to [amendment] :
(a) Amendment or suspension by the Governor pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 416.060.
(b) Suspension or nullification by the Legislative Commission
pursuant to Section 1 of Article 3 of the Nevada Constitution and
NRS 233B.0395 to 233B.120, inclusive, and sections 3 and 4 of
this act.
Sec. 16. NRS 233B.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.110 1. The validity or applicability of any regulation
may be determined in a proceeding for a declaratory judgment in the
district court in and for Carson City, or in and for the county where
the plaintiff resides, when it is alleged that the regulation, or its
proposed application, interferes with or impairs, or threatens to
interfere with or impair, the legal rights or privileges of the plaintiff.
A declaratory judgment may be rendered after the plaintiff has first
requested the agency to pass upon the validity of the regulation in
question. [The]
2. If all or any part of an action for a declaratory judgment
filed pursuant to this section relates to whether a regulation
violates statutory provisions or exceeds the statutory authority of
an agency, the court may enter an order requiring the plaintiff to
submit a petition to the Legislature Commission for its review of
the regulation pursuant to section 3 of this act. Such a petition
-
*SB340_R1*

– 19 –
must be in the format and contain the information required in
subsection 2 of section 3 of this act.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the court
shall declare the regulation invalid if it finds that it violates
constitutional or statutory provisions or exceeds the statutory
authority of the agency. In any action where the court must
determine whether the regulation violates statutory provisions or
exceeds the statutory authority of the agency and the Legislative
Commission or the Subcommittee to Review Regulations has
approved the regulation after reviewing it pursuant to NRS
233B.0633 or 233B.067 to 233B.0681, inclusive, as applicable, the
court:
(a) Must not substitute its judgment for the legal determination
of the Legislative Commission or the Subcommittee to Review
Regulations, made through its legislative approval of the
regulation, that the regulation conforms to the statutory authority
pursuant to which it was adopted and carries out the intent of the
Legislature in granting that authority;
(b) Must make every reasonable effort and indulge in every
reasonable presumption to uphold that legal determination of the
Legislative Commission or the Subcommittee to Review
Regulations and must resolve any ambiguity, uncertainty or doubt
against the plaintiff and in favor of that legal determination of the
Legislative Commission or the Subcommittee to Review
Regulations; and
(c) Must give great weight and deference to that legal
determination of the Legislative Commission or the Subcommittee
to Review Regulations and must uphold that legal determination if
it is reasonable as a matter of law.
4. The agency whose regulation is made the subject of the
action for the declaratory [action shall] judgment must be made a
party to the action.
[2.] 5. An agency may institute an action for a declaratory
judgment to establish the validity of any one or more of its own
regulations.
[3.] 6. Actions for a declaratory judgment provided for in
[subsections 1 and 2 shall] this section must be in accordance with
the Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act (chapter 30 of NRS), and
the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure.
7. In all actions under [subsections 1 and 2, the] this section:
(a) The plaintiff shall serve a copy of the complaint upon the
Attorney General, [who] or a person designated by the Attorney
General, at the Office of the Attorney General in Carson City; and
(b) The Attorney General is also entitled to be heard.
-
*SB340_R1*

– 20 –
8. This section must not be construed to limit the authority of
the Legislative Commission to suspend or nullify a regulation
pursuant to Section 1 of Article 3 of the Nevada Constitution and
NRS 233B.0395 to 233B.120, inclusive, and sections 3 and 4 of
this act.
9. As used in this section, “Subcommittee to Review
Regulations” means the Subcommittee to Review Regulations
appointed pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 233B.067.
Sec. 17. The amendatory provisions of sections 11 and 16 of
this act apply to any judicial proceedings:
1. Commenced on or after July 1, 2025; or
2. Commenced before July 1, 2025, if the proceedings are
pending or otherwise unresolved on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 18. This act becomes effective:
1. Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations pursuant to section 4 of this act and performing any
other preparatory administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out
the provisions of this act; and
2. On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB340_R1*